Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 14 Special Elections and Primaries Generally; Municipal Terms of Office

Cross references.

Special elections pertaining to prohibition of package sales of distilled spirits in counties and municipalities, §

3-4-40

et seq.

Special elections in counties and municipalities pertaining to authorization of sale of distilled spirits by private clubs, §

3-7-41

.

Registration of voters for special primaries and elections, §

21-2-228

.

Circumstances giving rise to special primary or election, §

21-2-504

.

Conducting of recall elections in same manner as special elections, §

21-4-14

.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-540.
Conduct of special primaries and special elections generally.

Every special primary and special election shall be held and conducted in all respects in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to general primaries and general elections; and the provisions of this chapter relating to general primaries and general elections shall apply thereto insofar as practicable and as not inconsistent with any other provisions of this chapter. All special primaries and special elections held at the time of a general primary, as provided by Code Section 21-2-541, shall be conducted by the poll officers by the use of the same equipment and facilities, insofar as practicable, as are used for such general primary. All special primaries and special elections held at the time of a general election, as provided by Code Section 21-2-541, shall be conducted by the poll officers by the use of the same equipment and facilities, insofar as practicable, as are used for such general election.

If a vacancy occurs in a partisan office to which the Governor is authorized to appoint an individual to serve until the next general election, a special primary shall precede the special election.

At least 29 days shall intervene between the call of a special primary and the holding of same, and at least 29 days shall intervene between the call of a special election and the holding of same. The period during which candidates may qualify to run in a special primary or a special election shall remain open for a minimum of two and one-half days. Special primaries and special elections which are to be held in conjunction with the presidential preference primary, a state-wide general primary, or state-wide general election shall be called at least 90 days prior to the date of such presidential preference primary, state-wide general primary, or state-wide general election; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to special primaries and special elections held on the same date as such presidential preference primary, state-wide general primary, or state-wide general election but conducted completely separate and apart from such state-wide general primary or state-wide general election using different ballots or voting equipment, facilities, poll workers, and paperwork.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a special primary or special election to fill a vacancy in a county or municipal office shall be held only on one of the following dates which is at least 29 days after the date of the call for the special election:

In odd-numbered years, any such special primary or special election shall only be held on:

The third Tuesday in March;

The third Tuesday in June;

The third Tuesday in September; or

The Tuesday after the first Monday in November; and

In even-numbered years, any such special primary or special election shall only be held on:

The third Tuesday in March; provided, however, that in the event that a special primary or special election is to be held under this provision in a year in which a presidential preference primary is to be held, then any such special primary or special election shall be held on the date of and in conjunction with the presidential preference primary;

The date of the general primary; or

The Tuesday after the first Monday in November;

provided, however, that, in the event that a special primary or special election to fill a federal or state office on a date other than the dates provided in this paragraph has been scheduled and it is possible to hold a special primary or special election to fill a vacancy in a county, municipal, or school board office in conjunction with such special primary or special election to fill a federal or state office, the special primary or special election to fill such county, municipal, or school board office may be held on the date of and in conjunction with such special primary or special election to fill such federal or state office, provided all other provisions of law regarding such primaries and elections are met.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a special election to present a question to the voters shall be held only on one of the following dates which is at least 29 days after the date of the call for the special election:

In odd-numbered years, any such special election shall only be held on the third Tuesday in March or on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November; and

In even-numbered years, any such special election shall only be held on:

The date of and in conjunction with the presidential preference primary if one is held that year;

The third Tuesday in March; provided, however, that such special election shall occur prior to July 1, 2024, and present a question to the voters on sales and use taxes authorized by Articles 5, 5A, and 5B of Chapter 8 of Title 48;

The date of the general primary; or

The Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:

Special elections held pursuant to Chapter 4 of this title, the “Recall Act of 1989,” to recall a public officer or to fill a vacancy in a public office caused by a recall election; and

Special primaries or special elections to fill vacancies in federal or state public offices.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the superintendent of each county or municipality shall publish the call of the special primary or special election.

Candidates in special elections for partisan offices that are not preceded by special primaries shall be listed alphabetically on the ballot and may choose to designate on the ballot their party affiliation. The party affiliation selected by a candidate shall not be changed following the close of qualifying.

Candidates in special primaries shall be listed alphabetically on the ballot.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 34-806, 34-1314, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 35; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 8A; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 14; Ga. L. 1984, p. 638, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 382, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1538, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 316, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 27; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 21; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 42; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, §§ 43, 44; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 64/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 131, § 1/HB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 25/HB 540; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, §§ 41, 42/SB 92; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 8/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 2, § 3/HB 42; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 43/SB 202; Ga. L. 2022, p. 310, § 1/HB 907.

The 2017 amendment,

effective February 23, 2017, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (c)(1).

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “Every special election shall be held and conducted in all respects in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to general elections; and the provisions of this chapter relating to general elections shall apply thereto insofar as practicable and as not inconsistent with any other provisions of this chapter. All special elections held at the time of a general election, as provided by Code Section 21-2-541, shall be conducted by the poll officers by the use of the same equipment and facilities, so far as practicable, as are used for such general election.”; in subsection (b), inserted “primaries and special” at the beginning and “special primaries and” near the middle of the third sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary, special elections which are to be held in conjunction with the state-wide general primary or state-wide general election in 2014 shall be called at least 60 days prior to the date of such state-wide general primary or state-wide general election.”; inserted “primary or special” in subparagraph (c)(1)(A); inserted “special primary or” in subparagraph (c)(1)(B), in two places in division (c)(1)(B)(i) and in five places in the undesignated language following division (c)(1)(B)(iii), inserted a comma following “state office” and “primaries and” near the end of the undesignated language following division (c)(1)(B)(iii); inserted “special primary or” near the end of subsection (d); and, in subsection (e), designated the existing provisions as paragraph (e)(1); inserted “that are not preceded by special primaries” in the first sentence in paragraph (e)(1); and added paragraph (e)(2).

The 2022 amendment,

effective February 15, 2022, added division (c)(2)(B)(ii), and redesignated former divisions (c)(2)(B)(ii) and (c)(2)(B)(iii) as present divisions (c)(2)(B)(iii) and (c)(2)(B)(iv), respectively.

Cross references.

Special elections in counties and municipalities pertaining to authorization of sale of distilled spirits by the drink, §

3-4-90

et seq.

Authorization of sale of distilled spirits by private clubs, §

3-7-40

.

Time for holding referendums imposing taxation, §

48-8-264.1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

In 2022, the Georgia General Assembly passed HB 907 and HB 934, both of which contained provisions relating to dates for special elections. HB 907, codified at §

21-2-540

, was signed by the Governor on February 15, 2022 (Act No. 310, Ga. L. 2022, p. 1). HB 934, codified at §

48-8-264.1

, was signed by the Governor on May 2, 2022 (Act No. 752, Ga. L. 2022, p. 256). The effect of codifying both is unclear.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Calls for primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Dates of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-8-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-541.
Holding of special primary or special election at time of general primary or general election; inclusion of candidates and questions in special primary or special election on ballot.

A special primary or election may be held at the time of a general primary or election.

If the times specified for the closing of the registration list for a special primary or special election are the same as those for a general primary or general election, the candidates and questions in such special primary or special election shall be included on the ballot for such general primary or general election. In such an instance, the name of the office and the candidates in such special primary or special election shall appear on the ballot in the position where such names would ordinarily appear if such contest was a general primary or general election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 174, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 808, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 166, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 44/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, in subsection (b), inserted “special” preceding “election” near the beginning and end of the first sentence, inserted “general” preceding “election” near the middle and end of the first sentence, and inserted “special primary or” near the middle and “general” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-541.1.
Terms for all municipal offices elected at general municipal elections.

All municipal offices elected at general municipal elections shall be for terms of four years unless otherwise provided by local law in accordance with Code Section 21-2-541.2. Unless otherwise provided for by the municipal charter, municipal officeholders shall be sworn in at their first organizational meeting of the new year and will hold office until their successors are duly elected and qualified and take said oath of office.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-541.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 45.

21-2-541.2.
Providing by local law for terms of office.

Notwithstanding Code Section 1-3-11 or any other provision of this chapter, the General Assembly is authorized to provide by local law:

For terms of two years for municipal offices, with the local law designating the offices to be elected and the time periods covered by such terms for each office;

For municipal offices to change from concurrent terms to staggered terms or from staggered terms to concurrent terms, with the local law designating the terms for each office;

For such terms to be staggered terms, with the local law designating the terms for each office;

For general municipal elections to fill such offices to be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November in even-numbered years and on such day biennially thereafter and on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years and on such day biennially thereafter;

For municipal offices elected pursuant to a prior local law authorized by this Code section to change to terms of office of four years, with the local law designating the offices to be elected and the time periods covered by such terms for each office;

For general municipal elections to fill such offices to be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November in any year during the first six years immediately following the enactment of a local law pursuant to this Code section as necessary for the purpose of changing the election and terms of any such municipal offices to conform to this Code section;

For initial terms of one, two, three, or four years as necessary to change the terms of such offices to four-year concurrent or staggered terms of office; and

Except as authorized in paragraph (6) of this Code section, for general municipal elections to be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November of any odd-numbered year.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-541.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-542.
Special primary and special election for United States senator vacancy; temporary appointment by Governor.

Whenever a vacancy shall occur in the representation of this state in the Senate of the United States, such vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the vote of the electors of the state at a special primary to be held at the time of the next general primary followed by a special election to be held at the time of the next November state-wide general election, occurring at least 40 days after the occurrence of such vacancy; and it shall be the duty of the Governor to issue his or her proclamation for such special primary and special election. Until such time as the vacancy shall be filled by an election as provided in this Code section, the Governor may make a temporary appointment to fill such vacancy.

History.

Ga. L. 1913, p. 135; Code 1933, § 34-2403; Code 1933, § 34-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 45/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, in the first sentence, inserted “a special primary to be held at the time of the next general primary followed by” near the middle and inserted “special primary and special” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

21-2-543.
Special election for United States congressional representative vacancy.

Whenever a vacancy shall occur or exist in the office of Representative in the United States Congress from this state the Governor shall issue, within ten days after the occurrence of such vacancy, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy, which election shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be less than 30 days after its issuance. Upon receiving the writ of election from the Governor, the Secretary of State shall then transmit the writ of election to the superintendent of each county involved and shall publish the call of the election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 638, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Calls for primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Dates of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-8-.01.

21-2-543.1.
Procedures for filling vacancies in federal House of Representatives.

In extraordinary circumstances, where the Speaker of the House of Representatives in the United States Congress announces that there are more than 100 vacancies in the federal House of Representatives, the Governor shall issue, within five days after the speaker announces that such number of vacancies exists, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill any such vacancy from this state, which election shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be more than 49 days after the speaker announces that such number of vacancies exists.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-543.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 15/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 21/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “vacancies exists” for “vacancies exist” in the middle of this Code section.